zh-CN: 抱子甘蓝品种: 泡泡; 卡茨基尔; 丘吉尔; 迪亚波罗; 赫斯提亚; 玉十字; 改良长岛; 诺迪克; 奥利弗; 红达令; 其他
nb: Rosenkål-variant: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Annet
tr: Brüksel lahanası çeşidi: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Diğer
ru: Сорт брюссельской капусты: Бабблз; Кэтскилл; Черчилль; Диабло; Гестия; Джейд Кросс; Лонг-Айленд улучшенная; Наутик; Оливер; Редарлинг; Другое
hu: Kelbimbófajta: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Egyéb
fi: Ruusukaalilajike: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Muu
pl: Odmiana brukselki: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Inne
zh-TW: 抱子甘藍品種: 泡泡球 (Bubbles); 卡茨基爾 (Catskill); 邱吉爾 (Churchill); 迪亞布羅 (Diablo); 赫斯提亞 (Hestia); 玉十字 (Jade Cross); 改良長島 (Long Island Improved); 諾提克 (Nautic); 奧立佛 (Oliver); 瑞達林 (Redarling); 其他
ko: 방울양배추 품종: 버블스; 캐츠킬; 처칠; 디아블로; 헤스티아; 제이드 크로스; 롱 아일랜드 임프루브드; 노틱; 올리버; 레달링; 기타
sl-SI: Sorta brstičnega ohrovta: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Drugo
lt-LT: Briuselio kopūstų rūšis: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Kitas
bg-BG: Сорт брюкселско зеле: Бъбълс; Катскил; Чърчил; Диабло; Хестия; Джейд крос; Лонг Айлънд подобрен; Наутик; Оливър; Редарлинг; Друго
vi: Giống cải Brussels: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Khác
fr: Variété de choux de Bruxelles: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Autre
it: varietà di cavolini di Bruxelles: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Altro
pt-PT: Variedade da couve de Bruxelas: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Outro
cs: Odrůda růžičkové kapusty: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Jiné
ja: 芽キャベツの種類: バブルス; キャッツキル; チャーチル; ディアブロ; ヘスティア; ジェードクロス; ロングアイランドインプルーブド; ノーティック; オリバー; リダーリング; その他
th: พันธุ์กะหล่ำดาว: บับเบิลส์; แคตสกิลล์; เชอร์ชิล; ดิอาโบล; เฮสเตีย; เจดครอส; ลองไอแลนด์อิมพรูฟด์; นอติก; โอลิเวอร์; รีดาร์ลิง; อื่นๆ
el: Ποικιλία στα λαχανάκια Βρυξελλών: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Άλλη
ro-RO: Varietate de varză de Bruxelles: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Altele
sv: Brysselkålssort: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Övrigt
sk-SK: Odroda ružičkového kelu: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Iné
es: Variedad de coles de Bruselas: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Otra
hr-HR: Sorta prokulica: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Ostalo
da: Rosenkålsvariant: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Andet
de: Rosenkohlsorte: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Sonstiges
nl: Spruitjes ras: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Overig
pt-BR: Variedade de couve-de-bruxelas: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Outros
en: Brussels sprout variety: Bubbles; Catskill; Churchill; Diablo; Hestia; Jade Cross; Long Island Improved; Nautic; Oliver; Redarling; Other